Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services shall distribute
moneys to a nonprofit organization  to provide grants to organizations for community vi-
olence prevention and intervention measures that address intermediate  risk factors and
support protective factors to decrease social pressure to engage in community  violence, in-
cluding, but not limited to, services related to:
(a) Substance abuse and alcohol misuse,  excluding direct treatment of substance use
disorders.
(b) Legal services.
(c) Educational attainment.
(d) Conflict resolution.
(e) Parent education.
(f) Employment services, including assistance procuring vital records  and official docu-
ments.
(g) Youth and gang intervention.
(h) Housing stability.
(i) Street outreach and norm change.
(2) The nonprofit organization providing grants under this section  may provide grants to
an organization that provides technical assistance to another organization that  qualifies to
receive grants under this section.
(3) The department shall require the nonprofit organization  providing grants under this
section to establish an open process  to apply for grants with targeted outreach to smaller
organizations. The nonprofit organization may not limit the size of organizations that may
apply for grants.
(4) The nonprofit organization providing grants under this section  may not award grants
to itself.
(5) The nonprofit organization providing grants under this  section shall report to the
department no later than November 30 of each year. The report must include:
(a) The total number of organizations that received grants;
(b) Examples of how grants were used;
(c) The size of organizations that received grants; and
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-A) Page 1
(d) An analysis of the service impact of each organization that received a grant.
(6) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 2.
The nonprofit organization providing grants under  section 1 of this 2022 Act
shall submit the first report to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services required
under section 1 (5) of this 2022 Act no later than November 30, 2023.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a program to provide  grants
for planning, provider training and certification and general capacity to hospitals and
community-based organizations to develop hospital-based violence intervention programs  in
communities of need other than in Multnomah  County to reduce and interrupt the chronic
cycle of community violence.
(2) The authority shall require a hospital  or organization receiving a grant under this
section to demonstrate:
(a) A commitment to national best practices and standards of care; and
(b) An understanding of the hospital-based  violence intervention model, the role of
trusted community messengers and a plan to certify violence prevention professionals.
(3) The authority may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Act of community violence” means an intentional  act of interpersonal violence
committed in public by someone who is not the victim’s  family member or intimate partner.
(b) “Certified violence prevention professional” means a person  certified by a program
approved under subsection (2) of this section.
(c)(A) “Community violence prevention  services” includes evidence-based, trauma-
informed, supportive and nonpsychotherapeutic services, offered in or out of a clinical set-
ting.
(B) “Community violence prevention services” also includes but is not limited to peer
support or  counseling, mentorship, conflict mediation, crisis intervention, targeted case
management, referrals to certified or licensed health care or social  services providers, and
patient education and screening services,  provided by a certified violence prevention profes-
sional to:
(i) Promote improved health outcomes and positive behavioral change;
(ii) Prevent injury recidivism; and
(iii) Reduce the likelihood that victims of acts of community violence will  commit or
promote violence themselves.
(2) The Oregon  Health Authority shall approve at least one national training and certif-
ication program for  certified violence prevention professionals and shall establish a process
to approve community-based training programs. A  program approved under this subsection
must require at least  35 hours of initial training and six hours of continuing education every
two years and must address:
(a) The profound effects of trauma and violence and the  basics of trauma-informed care;
(b) Community violence prevention strategies, including crisis intervention,  de-
escalation, conflict mediation and retaliation prevention;
(c) Case management and advocacy practices; and
(d) Patient privacy requirements under the federal Health Insurance  Portability and Ac-
countability Act privacy regulations, 45 C.F.R. parts 160 and 164.
(3) A person  that employs or contracts with a certified violence prevention professional
to provide community violence prevention services shall:
(a) Maintain documentation that the professional is certified by a  program approved un-
der subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) Ensure that the professional complies with applicable state or federal laws, regu-
lations, rules and standards of care.
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-A) Page 2
(4) The authority shall  seek federal approval to secure federal financial participation in
the costs of providing medical assistance  program coverage for community violence pre-
vention services for medical assistance program enrollees who:
(a) Have received medical treatment for an injury sustained from an  act of community
violence; and
(b) Have been referred by  a certified or licensed health care or social services provider
to receive  services from a certified violence prevention professional after the provider de-
termined the enrollee is at a higher risk of retaliation or a violent injury from  another act
of community violence.
(5) The authority may adopt rules to implement this section.
(6) The authority  shall establish a technical advisory group to support implementation
of this section. The group must include:
(a) Three members representing  a community-based organization that currently supports
a hospital-based violence prevention program in Oregon;
(b) One member representing a national organization  that provides technical assistance
for emerging hospital-based violence prevention programs;
(c) One member representing a hospital that currently operates a hospital-based  violence
prevention program in Oregon;
(d) One member representing a hospital  or hospitals in Oregon that do not currently
operate a hospital-based violence prevention program;
(e) One member of an Oregon-based academic institution with knowledge of hospital-
based violence prevention programs;
(f) Four members representing coordinated care organizations  in geographically diverse
areas of Oregon, three of which must be outside of Multnomah County; and
(g) Two members representing health care clinicians with experience in Medicaid billing
and experience providing trauma care as a result of community violence.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall  seek federal approval to secure fed-
eral financial participation in the costs of providing medical assistance program coverage  for
community violence prevention  services for medical assistance program enrollees, as re-
quired by section 4 (4) of this 2022 Act, no later than October 1, 2022.
(2) The authority shall approve at least one national training program for certified vi-
olence prevention professionals, as  required by section 4 (2) of this 2022 Act, no later than
October 1, 2022.
(3) The authority shall establish  a process to approve community-based training pro-
grams for certified  violence prevention professionals, as required by section 4 (2) of this 2022
Act, no later than November 15, 2022.
SECTION 6. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, which may be  expended for purposes of awarding
grants under section 3 of this 2022 Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount  of $2,500,000, for distribution to the Portland Opportunities
Industrialization Center for the purpose of awarding grants under section  1 of this 2022 Act.
(3) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to  the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  out
of the General Fund, the amount  of $1,500,000, for distribution to the Portland Opportunities
Industrialization Center to increase  capacity of the Healing Hurt People program to reduce
community violence.
SECTION 7. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-A) Page 3
Passed by House February 28, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4045 (HB 4045-A) Page 4